New York, session 2025-2026, A791.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "sick leave for pet care act". 3 § 2. Subparagraphs (ii) and (iii) of paragraph a and paragraph b of 4 subdivision 4 of section 196-b of the labor law, as added by section 1 5 of part J of chapter 56 of the laws of 2020, are amended to read as 6 follows: 7 (ii) for the diagnosis, care, or treatment of a mental or physical 8 illness, injury or health condition of, or need for medical diagnosis 9 of, or preventive care for, such employee or such employee's family 10 member; [or] 11 (iii) for an absence from work due to any of the following reasons 12 when the employee or employee's family member has been the victim of 13 domestic violence pursuant to subdivision thirty-four of section two 14 hundred ninety-two of the executive law, a family offense, sexual 15 offense, stalking, or human trafficking: 16 (a) to obtain services from a domestic violence shelter, rape crisis 17 center, or other services program; 18 (b) to participate in safety planning, temporarily or permanently 19 relocate, or take other actions to increase the safety of the employee 20 or employee's family members; 21 (c) to meet with an attorney or other social services provider to 22 obtain information and advice on, and prepare for or participate in any 23 criminal or civil proceeding; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00703-01-5 A. 791 2 1 (d) to file a complaint or domestic incident report with law enforce- 2 ment; 3 (e) to meet with a district attorney's office; 4 (f) to enroll children in a new school; or 5 (g) to take any other actions necessary to ensure the health or safety 6 of the employee or the employee's family member or to protect those who 7 associate or work with the employee. 8 For purposes of this [subdivision] subparagraph, the reasons outlined 9 above in [subparagraph] clauses (a) through (g) must be related to the 10 domestic violence, family offense, sexual offense, stalking, or human 11 trafficking. Provided further that a person who has committed such 12 domestic violence, family offense, sexual offense, stalking, or human 13 trafficking shall not be eligible for leave under this subdivision for 14 situations in which the person committed such offense and was not a 15 victim, notwithstanding any family relationship; or 16 (iv) for the diagnosis, care, or treatment of a physical illness, 17 injury or health condition of, or need for medical diagnosis of, or 18 preventive care for, such employee's covered animal. 19 b. For purposes of this section, "family member" shall mean an employ- 20 ee's child, spouse, domestic partner, parent, sibling, grandchild or 21 grandparent; and the child or parent of an employee's spouse or domestic 22 partner. "Parent" shall mean a biological, foster, step- or adoptive 23 parent, or a legal guardian of an employee, or a person who stood in 24 loco parentis when the employee was a minor child. "Child" shall mean a 25 biological, adopted or foster child, a legal ward, or a child of an 26 employee standing in loco parentis. "Covered animal" shall mean an 27 employee's animal that is a service animal or an animal kept primarily 28 for companionship in compliance with all applicable laws. 29 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.